District of Columbia statutes.
42-804

Survival of mortgagee’s or trustee’s title.

Whenever a mortgage or deed of trust to secure a debt is executed to 2 or more mortgagees or trustees in fee simple, upon the death of any 1 or more of them the legal title and the trust attached to it shall be held to survive to the survivor or survivors and the heirs of the last survivor, subject to the provisions aforesaid.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1272, ch. 854, § 533
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263,§ 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551
1981 Ed., § 45-704.
1973 Ed., § 45-604.
D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).